Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Cross references. —

For constitutional provision as to protection of labor, see art. 1, § 22, Wyo. Const.

As to right of action for injuries in connection with mining operations, see art. 9, § 4, Wyo. Const.

For constitutional provisions concerning labor generally, see art. 19, Wyo. Const.

As to relationship of master and servant as sufficient cause for challenge in connection with jury duty, see §

1-11-203

.

As to parole to permit continuation of employment, see §§

7-13-501

through

7-13-504

.

As to labor by prisoners generally, see chapter 16 of title 7.

As to preference for Wyoming contractors, labor, etc., generally, in connection with public works and contractors, see §§

16-6-102

through

16-6-108

.

As to disputed labor claims in connection with public works contracts and contractor's bonds, see §

16-6-117

.

As to Wyoming Preference Act of 1971, see §§

16-6-201

through

16-6-206

.

As to exemption of members of national guard from labor on the public highways, see §

19-9-401

.

As to preference with reference to employment of veterans in public departments or public works, see §

19-14-102

.

For provisions that employees are entitled to time off to vote, see §

22-2-111

.

As to interference with employees' political rights or threatening discharge for political involvements, see §§

22-26-116

through

22-26-118

.

As to mechanics', materialmen's, and laborers' liens generally, see title 29.

For authority of public utilities to furnish transportation free of charge or at reduced rates to employees and former employees, etc., see §

37-3-105

.

Library References.

Larson's Workers' Compensation Law §§ 29.03, 76.02D, 77.01, 77.02, 126.04D (Matthew Bender).